Georgia statutes. 
(2) A small wireless facility that is not operated or a support structure or pole that is not utilized for a continuous period of 12 months shall be considered abandoned, and the owner of such small wireless facility, support structure, or pole shall remove such within 90 days after receipt of written notice from the authority notifying such owner of such small wireless facility, support structure, or pole of the abandonment. The authority shall send the notice by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, to such owner at the last known address of such owner of the small wireless facility, support structure, or pole. If the owner does not provide written notice that the small wireless facility has not been out of operation or the support structure or pole has in fact been utilized for a continuous period of 12 months or does not remove such small wireless facility, support structure, or pole within the 90 day period, the authority may remove or cause the removal of such small wireless facility, support structure, or pole pursuant to the terms of its support structure or pole attachment agreement for authority poles or through actions provided for abatement of nuisances or by other law for removal and cost recovery.

(q) If the authority determines that a wireless provider's activity in a right of way pursuant to this chapter creates an imminent risk to public safety, the authority may provide written notice to the wireless provider and demand that the wireless provider address such risk. If the wireless provider fails to reasonably address the risk within 24 hours of the written notice, the authority may take or cause to be taken action to reasonably address such risk and charge the wireless provider the reasonable documented cost of such actions.

(r) The authority may require a wireless provider to repair all damage to a right of way directly caused by the activities of the wireless provider, while occupying, installing, repairing, or maintaining small wireless facilities, poles, or support structures, in such right of way and to restore the right of way to its condition before the damage occurred pursuant to the competitively neutral and reasonable requirements and specifications of the authority. If the wireless provider fails to return the right of way, to the extent practicable in the reasonable judgment of the authority, to its condition prior to the damage within 90 days of receipt of written notice from the authority, the authority may, at the sole discretion of the authority, restore the right of way to such condition and charge the wireless provider its reasonable, documented cost of doing so, plus a penalty not to exceed $500.00. The authority may suspend the ability of the wireless provider to receive any new permits from the authority until the wireless provider has paid the amount assessed for such restoration costs and the penalty assessed, if any; provided, however, that the authority shall not suspend such ability of any applicant that has deposited the amount in controversy in escrow pending an adjudication of the merits of the dispute by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(s) An authority shall send any notice or decision required by this Code section by registered or certified mail, statutory overnight delivery, hand delivery, or email transmission. The decision or notice shall be deemed delivered upon email transmission, deposit into overnight mail or regular mail receptacle with adequate postage paid, or actual receipt if delivered by hand.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-7, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-8. Compliance with all applicable law.

Statute text

Applications for any other uses that are not expressly set forth or referenced in subsection (a) of Code Section 36-66C-6 or that are not otherwise addressed by this chapter shall require compliance with, and issuance of a permit under, applicable law. Without limiting the foregoing, any modification, maintenance, repair, or replacement that is not set forth in subsections (e) and (f) of Code Section 36-66C-6 or that is not eligible for administrative review under Code Section 36-66C-7 shall require compliance with, and issuance of a permit under, applicable law.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-8, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-9. Due care during installation and maintenance; interference prohibited.

Statute text

(a) An applicant in the right of way shall employ due care during the installation and maintenance process and shall comply with all safety and right of way protection requirements of general applicability set forth in applicable law.

(b) An applicant in the right of way shall not place any small wireless facilities, support structures, poles, or decorative poles where they will interfere with any existing infrastructure or equipment and shall locate its lines and equipment in such a manner as not to interfere unnecessarily with the usual vehicular or pedestrian traffic patterns or with the rights or reasonable convenience of owners of property that abuts any right of way.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-9, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-10. Collocation within historic district; limitations.

Statute text

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, within a historic district, an applicant may collocate a small wireless facility and may place or replace a pole, only upon satisfaction of the following:

(1) The issuance of a permit under subsection (a) of Code Section 36-66C-6; and

(2) (A) Compliance with any objective, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory aesthetic and structural requirements that have been made publicly available in writing by the authority at least 30 days prior to submission of the application; provided, however, that any such requirements may not have the effect of materially inhibiting any wireless provider's technology or service, and compliance with any such requirements shall not be considered a part of the small wireless facility for purposes of the size restrictions in the definition of small wireless facility; or

(B) In the absence of any such requirements, a replacement pole shall be substantially similar in height and appearance to the pole being replaced.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-10, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-11. Alternate locations; certification.

Statute text

For applications for new poles in the right of way in areas zoned for residential use, the authority may propose an alternate location in the right of way within 100 feet of the location set forth in the application, and the wireless provider shall use the authority's proposed alternate location unless the location imposes technical limits or significant additional costs. The wireless provider shall certify that it has made such a determination in good faith, based on the assessment of a licensed engineer, and it shall provide a written summary of the basis for such determination.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-11, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-12. Requirements for use of decorative poles.

Statute text

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, an applicant may collocate a small wireless facility on a decorative pole, or may replace a decorative pole with a new decorative pole, in the event the existing decorative pole will not structurally support the attachment, only upon satisfaction of the following:

(1) The issuance of a permit under subsection (a) of Code Section 36-66C-6; and

(2) (A) Compliance with any objective and reasonable aesthetic and structural requirements that have been made publicly available in writing by the authority at least 30 days prior to submission of the application; provided, however, that any such requirements shall not have the effect of materially inhibiting any wireless provider's technology or service, and compliance with any such requirements shall not be considered a part of the small wireless facility for purposes of the size restrictions in the definition of small wireless facility; or

(B) In the absence of any such requirements, a replacement decorative pole shall be substantially similar in height and appearance to the decorative pole being replaced.

The authority shall operate authority fixtures on the replaced decorative pole, and, absent an agreement to the contrary between the authority and the wireless provider that is confirmed by email or other writing, the authority shall take ownership of the new decorative pole.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-12, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-13. Consolidated applications.

Statute text

(a) An applicant may submit a single consolidated application, provided that such a consolidated application shall be for a geographic area no more than two miles in diameter and shall comply with this Code section. The denial of one or more small wireless facilities or poles in a consolidated application shall not delay the processing of any other small wireless facilities or poles in the same application. An authority may issue a single permit or multiple permits for the small wireless facilities and poles in a consolidated application.

(b) In a Class I Authority:

(1) A consolidated application for the placement of new poles and the collocation of one or more small wireless facilities on such new poles may include no more than ten poles and any associated small wireless facilities. While an applicant has applications, including consolidated applications, pending before the Class I Authority for review of 25 or more new poles and the collocation of associated small wireless facilities, the Class I Authority may, but shall not be required to, toll the processing requirements under Code Section 36-66C-7 for any application subsequently submitted by the same applicant for the placement of new poles and the collocation of associated small wireless facilities. The number of new poles with collocated small wireless facilities pending for review before the Class I Authority that may toll the processing requirements for subsequent applications pursuant to this paragraph shall increase to 30, effective July 1, 2020; to 35, effective July 1, 2021; to 40, effective July 1, 2022; to 45, effective July 1, 2023; and to 50, effective July 1, 2024; and

(2) A consolidated application for the collocation of small wireless facilities on existing poles or support structures may include no more than 20 sites. While an applicant has applications, including consolidated applications, pending before the Class I Authority for review of 70 or more sites for the collocation of small wireless facilities on existing poles or support structures, the Class I Authority may, but shall not be required to, toll the processing requirements under Code Section 36-66C-7 for any application subsequently submitted by the same applicant for the collocation of small wireless facilities on existing poles or support structures. The number of sites for the collocation of small wireless facilities pending for review before the Class I Authority that may toll the processing requirements for subsequent applications pursuant to this subparagraph shall increase to 80, effective July 1, 2020; to 90, effective July 1, 2021; to 100, effective July 1, 2022; to 110, effective July 1, 2023; and to 120, effective July 1, 2024.

(c) In a Class II Authority:

(1) A consolidated application for the placement of new poles and the collocation of one or more small wireless facilities on such new poles may include no more than five poles and any associated small wireless facilities. While an applicant has applications, including consolidated applications, pending before the Class II Authority for review of 15 or more new poles and the collocation of associated small wireless facilities, the Class II Authority may, but shall not be required to, toll the processing requirements under Code Section 36-66C-7 for any application subsequently submitted by the same applicant for the placement of new poles and the collocation of associated small wireless facilities; and

(2) A consolidated application for the collocation of small wireless facilities on existing poles or support structures may include no more than 15 sites. While an applicant has applications, including consolidated applications, pending before the Class II Authority for review of 45 or more sites for the collocation of small wireless facilities on existing poles or support structures, the Class II Authority may toll the processing requirements under Code Section 36-66C-7 for any application subsequently submitted by the same applicant for the collocation of small wireless facilities on existing poles or support structures.

(d) In a Class III Authority:

(1) A consolidated application for the placement of new poles and the collocation of one or more small wireless facilities on such new poles may include no more than two poles and any associated small wireless facilities. While an applicant has applications, including consolidated applications, pending before the Class III Authority for review of eight or more new poles and the collocation of associated small wireless facilities, the Class III Authority may, but shall not be required to, toll the processing requirements under Code Section 36-66C-7 for any application subsequently submitted by the same applicant for the placement of new poles and the collocation of associated small wireless facilities; and

(2) A consolidated application for the collocation of small wireless facilities on existing poles or support structures may include no more than six sites. While an applicant has applications, including consolidated applications, pending before the Class III Authority for review of 24 or more sites for the collocation of small wireless facilities on existing poles or support structures, the Class III Authority may, but shall not be required to, toll the processing requirements under Code Section 36-66C-7 for any application subsequently submitted by the same applicant for the collocation of small wireless facilities on existing poles or support structures.

(e) For purposes of subsections (b), (c), and (d) of this Code section:

(1) Small wireless facilities and poles that a wireless services provider applicant has requested a third party to deploy and that are included in a pending application by the third party shall be counted as pending requests by the wireless services provider applicant; and

(2) When the processing of an application is tolled pursuant to subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this Code section, the application is no longer counted as pending. As processing of applications is completed, the authority shall begin processing previously tolled applications in the order in which they were submitted, unless the applicant specifies a different order.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-13, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, "of this Code section" was inserted in the first sentence of paragraph (e)(2).

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-14. Resolution of conflicting requests.

Statute text

If multiple applications are received by the authority to install two or more poles or decorative poles at the same location or to collocate two or more small wireless facilities on the same pole, decorative pole, or support structure, the authority shall resolve conflicting requests in an appropriate, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory manner.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-14, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-15. Indemnification and liability.

Statute text

(a) An authority shall not require a wireless provider to indemnify and hold the authority and its officers and employees harmless against any claims, lawsuits, judgments, costs, liens, losses, expenses, or fees arising from the wireless provider's activities in the public right of way under this chapter, except when a court of competent jurisdiction has found that the negligence of the wireless provider while conducting such activities caused the harm that resulted in such claims, lawsuits, judgments, costs, liens, losses, expenses, or fees or to require a wireless provider to obtain insurance naming the authority or its officers and employees an additional insured against any of the foregoing.

(b) In no event shall any authority or any officer, employee, or agent affiliated therewith, while in the performance of its or his or her official duties, be liable for any claim related to the siting, installation, maintenance, repair, replacement, relocation, permitting, or location of wireless equipment, facilities, poles, or infrastructure, including, but not limited to, any claim for destruction, damage, business interruption, or signal interference with other communications service providers wherein such siting, installation, maintenance, repair, replacement, relocation, permitting, or location was undertaken in substantial compliance with this chapter.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-15, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-16. Extra services.

Statute text

Absent an agreement to the contrary that is made public and that is available for adoption upon the same terms and conditions to any requesting wireless provider, an authority shall not require an applicant to perform services unrelated to the collocation for which approval is sought, such as in-kind contributions to the authority, including reserving fiber, conduit, or space on a utility pole or a wireless support structure for the authority, and such authority may not require an applicant to transfer small wireless facilities, poles, decorative poles, or support structures to the authority, provided that the authority may require transfer of an authority pole replaced by the applicant to accommodate its collocation.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-16, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-17. Application if prior agreement in place.

Statute text

If an authority and a wireless provider entered into an agreement addressing the subject matter of this chapter prior to October 1, 2019:

(1) This chapter shall not apply until such agreement expires or is terminated pursuant to its terms with regard to poles, decorative poles, support structures, replacement poles, and small wireless facilities installed pursuant to such agreement prior to October 1, 2019; and

(2) Otherwise, the provisions of this chapter shall apply to poles, decorative poles, support structures, replacement poles, and small wireless facilities installed on or after October 1, 2019.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-17, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-18. Limitations.

Statute text

Except to the extent authorized by current or future federal law, nothing in this chapter shall authorize this state or any political subdivision thereof, including, but not limited to, an authority, to require small wireless facility deployment or to regulate wireless services.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-18, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-19. Conflicting provisions.

Statute text

In the event of any conflict between the provisions of this chapter and the provisions of Chapter 66B of this title, this chapter shall control as to the collocation of small wireless facilities and the construction, installation, maintenance, modification, operation, and replacement of poles or support structures by wireless providers in the right of way.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-19, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-20. Wireline backhaul facilities not addressed; no communication services authorized; utilization of rights of ways.

Statute text

(a) The construction, installation, maintenance, modification, operation, and replacement of wireline backhaul facilities in the right of way are not addressed by this chapter, and any such activity shall comply with Code Section 46-5-1, Chapter 76 of this title, and other applicable law.

(b) The approval of the installation, placement, maintenance, or operation of a small wireless facility pursuant to this chapter shall not authorize the provision of any communications services.

(c) Except as provided in this chapter or otherwise expressly authorized by state or federal law, an authority shall not adopt or enforce any ordinances, regulations, or requirements as to the placement or operation of communications facilities in a right of way by a communications services provider authorized by state or local law to operate in a right of way, regulate any communications services, or impose or collect any tax, fee, or charge for the provision of communications services over the communications services provider's communications facilities in a right of way.

(d) This chapter shall not apply to an authority to the extent that such authority uses communications facilities to provide free Wi-Fi services to the public.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-20, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-21. No relief of duties.

Statute text

Nothing in this chapter relieves any person of any duties set forth in Chapter 9 of Title 25.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-21, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

——————————

CHAPTER 67

ZONING PROPOSAL REVIEW PROCEDURES

36-67-1 through 36-67-6.

Statute text

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 351, § 1/HB 1089, effective April 19, 2012.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - This chapter consisted of Code Sections 36-67-1 through 36-67-6, relating to zoning proposal review procedures, and was based on Ga. L. 1985, p. 1178, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2202, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3017, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1473, § 1.

——————————

CHAPTER 67A

CONFLICT OF INTEREST IN ZONING ACTIONS

Sec.

36-67A-1. Definitions.

36-67A-2. Disclosure of financial interests.

36-67A-3. Disclosure of campaign contributions.

36-67A-4. Penalties.

36-67A-5. Appointment of disinterested special master if governing authority unable to attain a quorum.

36-67A-6. Voting on zoning decision if ordinance being adopted for first time or ordinance being revised pursuant to comprehensive plan.

Annotations

Cross references. - Ethics and Efficiency in Government Act, T. 28, C. 11.

Codes of ethics and conflicts of interest, T. 45, C. 10.

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, Chapter 85, as enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1269, § 1, was redesignated as Chapter 67A.

Law reviews. - For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986). For annual survey of law of real property, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 319 (1986).

For note on 1991 amendments to this chapter, see 8 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 114 (1992).

36-67A-1. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Applicant" means any person who applies for a rezoning action and any attorney or other person representing or acting on behalf of a person who applies for a rezoning action.

(2) "Business entity" means any corporation, partnership, limited partnership, firm, enterprise, franchise, association, or trust.

(2.1) "Campaign contribution" means a "contribution" as defined in paragraph (7) of Code Section 21-5-3.

(3) "Financial interest" means all direct ownership interests of the total assets or capital stock of a business entity where such ownership interest is 10 percent or more.

(4) "Local government" means any county or municipality of this state.

(5) "Local government official" means any member of the governing authority of a local government or any member of a planning or zoning commission.

(6) "Member of the family" means the spouse, mother, father, brother, sister, son, or daughter of a local government official.

(6.1) "Opponent" means any person who opposes a rezoning action or any attorney or other person representing or acting on behalf of a person who opposes a rezoning action.

(6.2) "Oppose" means to appear before, discuss with, or contact, either orally or in writing, any local government or local government official and argue against a rezoning action.

(6.3) "Person" means an individual, partnership, committee, association, corporation, labor organization, or any other organization or group of persons.

(7) "Property interest" means the direct ownership of real property and includes any percentage of ownership less than total ownership.

(8) "Real property" means any tract or parcel of land and, if developed, any buildings or structures located on the land.

(9) "Rezoning action" means action by local government adopting an amendment to a zoning ordinance which has the effect of rezoning real property from one zoning classification to another.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-67A-1, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1269, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1365, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 24/HB 48.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Law reviews. - For article, "Local Government Law," see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001). For article on the 2005 amendment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2005).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Bias or interest of administrative officer sitting in zoning proceeding as necessitating disqualification of officer or affecting validity of zoning decision, 4 A.L.R.6th 263.

36-67A-2. Disclosure of financial interests.

Statute text

A local government official who knew or reasonably should have known he or she:

(1) Has a property interest in any real property affected by a rezoning action which that official's local government will have the duty to consider;

(2) Has a financial interest in any business entity which has a property interest in any real property affected by a rezoning action which that official's local government will have the duty to consider; or

(3) Has a member of the family having any interest described in paragraph (1) or (2) of this Code section

shall immediately disclose the nature and extent of such interest, in writing, to the governing authority of the local government in which the local government official is a member. The local government official who has an interest as defined in paragraph (1) or (2) of this Code section shall disqualify himself from voting on the rezoning action. The disqualified local government official shall not take any other action on behalf of himself or any other person to influence action on the application for rezoning. The disclosures provided for in this Code section shall be a public record and available for public inspection at any time during normal working hours.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-67A-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1269, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1365, § 1.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Bias or interest of administrative officer sitting in zoning proceeding as necessitating disqualification of officer or affecting validity of zoning decision, 4 A.L.R.6th 263.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Statute of limitations. - Because the tolling exception to the statute of limitation applied to the failure to disclose a financial interest charge, and the prosecution for that charge was timely commenced after the crime was discovered, the trial court did not err by denying the defendant's plea in bar based on the expiration of the statute of limitation. Kenerly v. State, 325 Ga. App. 412, 750 S.E.2d 822 (2013).

36-67A-3. Disclosure of campaign contributions.

Statute text

(a) When any applicant for rezoning action has made, within two years immediately preceding the filing of that applicant's application for the rezoning action, campaign contributions aggregating $250.00 or more to a local government official who will consider the application, it shall be the duty of the applicant to file a disclosure report with the governing authority of the respective local government showing:

(1) The name and official position of the local government official to whom the campaign contribution was made; and

(2) The dollar amount and description of each campaign contribution made by the applicant to the local government official during the two years immediately preceding the filing of the application for the rezoning action and the date of each such contribution.

(b) The disclosures required by subsection (a) of this Code section shall be filed within ten days after the application for the rezoning action is first filed.

(c) When any opponent of a rezoning action has made, within two years immediately preceding the filing of the rezoning action being opposed, campaign contributions aggregating $250.00 or more to a local government official of the local government which will consider the application, it shall be the duty of the opponent to file a disclosure with the governing authority of the respective local government showing:

(1) The name and official position of the local government official to whom the campaign contribution was made; and

(2) The dollar amount and description of each campaign contribution made by the opponent to the local government official during the two years immediately preceding the filing of the application for the rezoning action and the date of each such contribution.

(d) The disclosure required by subsection (c) of this Code section shall be filed at least five calendar days prior to the first hearing by the local government or any of its agencies on the rezoning application.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-67A-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1269, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1365, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36.)

36-67A-4. Penalties.

Statute text

Any person knowingly failing to comply with the requirements of this chapter or violating the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-67A-4, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1269, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1365, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Statute of limitations. - Because the tolling exception to the statute of limitation applied to the failure to disclose a financial interest charge, and the prosecution for that charge was timely commenced after the crime was discovered, the trial court did not err by denying the defendant's plea in bar based on the expiration of the statute of limitation. Kenerly v. State, 325 Ga. App. 412, 750 S.E.2d 822 (2013).

36-67A-5. Appointment of disinterested special master if governing authority unable to attain a quorum.

Statute text

(a) Where one or more disqualifications required by this chapter result in the inability of the governing authority of the county or municipality to attain a quorum for the purpose of making a final decision when considering a rezoning action, the governing authority immediately shall petition the superior court wherein the property which is the subject of the rezoning is located for appointment of a disinterested special master for the purpose of hearing evidence regarding the proposed rezoning action and making a recommendation to the petitioning governing authority. The court, in its order appointing the special master, shall give such directions for notice and the service thereof as well as for the time in which a hearing must be held and recommendations issued as are just and appropriate under the circumstances and as are consistent with this chapter.

(b) The disinterested special master provided for in this Code section shall be appointed by the judge or judges of the superior courts of each judicial circuit and shall discharge the duties provided for in this Code section. The special master so appointed must be a competent attorney at law, be of good standing in his profession, and have at least three years' experience in the practice of law. He shall hold office at the pleasure of the judge and shall be removable at any time with or without cause. The court, in its order appointing the special master, shall designate the person or entity responsible for compensating the special master at a rate not less than $50.00 per day nor more than $250.00 per day for the time actually devoted to the hearing and consideration of the matter.

(c) The special master shall consider any factors relevant in balancing the interest in promoting the public health, safety, morality, or general welfare against the right to the unrestricted use of property.

(d) The hearing provided for in this Code section and all records pertinent thereto shall be open and available to the public.

(e) Nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed as a delegation of the final decision-making powers of the governing authority to the special master and the recommendation of the special master is not a final decision as to the rezoning action. Where a special master has been appointed and has made a recommendation, the disqualification requirement of Code Section 36-67A-2 shall be waived.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-67A-5, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1365, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "The New Special Master Rule - Uniform Superior Court Rule 46: Life Jackets for the Courts in the Perfect Storm," see 15 (No. 4) Ga. St. B. J. 20 (2009).

36-67A-6. Voting on zoning decision if ordinance being adopted for first time or ordinance being revised pursuant to comprehensive plan.

Statute text

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a local government official from voting on a zoning decision when the local government is adopting a zoning ordinance for the first time or when a local government is voting upon a revision of the zoning ordinance initiated by the local government pursuant to a comprehensive plan as defined in Chapter 70 of this title.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-67A-6, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1365, § 1.)

——————————

CHAPTER 68

MERGER OF MUNICIPAL GOVERNMENT WITH COUNTY

Sec.

36-68-1. Constitutional authority; purpose.

36-68-2. Optional features of enabling local law.

36-68-3. Mandatory features of enabling local law.

36-68-4. Conditions under which county containing no municipality deemed to constitute a consolidated government; election; consolidated government to constitute a municipal corporation as well as a county for certain purposes.

Annotations

Law reviews. - For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986).

36-68-1. Constitutional authority; purpose.

Statute text

This chapter is enacted pursuant to the authority of Article IX, Section III, Paragraph II, subparagraph (b) of the Constitution. It is the purpose of this chapter to grant authority to the General Assembly to provide by local law for a form of governmental reorganization whereby the charter of a municipality is repealed in order for the county in which the municipality is located to succeed to the corporate powers, functions, rights, assets, and liabilities of the municipality. This chapter shall be liberally construed to carry out effectively such purpose.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-68-1, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1080, § 1.)

36-68-2. Optional features of enabling local law.

Statute text

(a) Subject to the requirements of Code Section 36-68-3, when the charter of a municipality is repealed by local law as a part of achieving a governmental reorganization described in Code Section 36-68-1, the General Assembly may also provide by local law for any of the following matters:

(1) The form of government of the county which is the successor to the corporate powers, functions, rights, properties, and obligations of the municipality;

(2) The county to constitute a municipality as well as a county for the purposes of the application of the general laws and Constitution of this state;

(3) The exercise by the county of the powers vested in the former municipality and in municipalities generally as well as the powers vested in the county and counties generally;

(4) The county to receive any grants or other types of funds or revenues which the former municipality was entitled to receive as well as grants or other types of funds or revenues which the county is entitled to receive;

(5) The status of the county relative to any municipalities, other than the municipality having its charter repealed, located wholly or partially within such county;

(6) The transfer of all assets and properties of the municipality to the county;

(7) The assumption by the county of all contractual and other obligations of the municipality;

(8) The transfer of employees of the municipality to the county and for the preservation of any rights of such employees and their beneficiaries existing under any retirement or pension system of the municipality; and

(9) Any other matters reasonably necessary or convenient to achieve and implement effectively a governmental reorganization described by Code Section 36-68-1.

(b) A local law enacted pursuant to the authority of subsection (a) of this Code section may provide for such procedures, requirements, and limitations as may be reasonably necessary to control the subjects included within such local law, and the provisions of said subsection (a) shall not be construed to limit the manner in which the General Assembly may by local law control the subjects described by said subsection (a).

History

(Code 1981, § 36-68-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1080, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
